Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3407
Records pertaining to use.

(1) A program shall collect and verify records pertaining to the use of a vehicle, including sharing periods, sharing period pick-up and drop-off locations, fees paid by each driver, and revenue received by each owner.

(2) A program shall provide the information collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section upon request to the owner, the owner's insurer, and the driver's insurer to facilitate a claim coverage investigation, settlement, negotiation, or litigation.

(3) A program shall retain the records required in this section for a period of not less than four years.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 7.